Utah statutes.
78B-7-304.   Nonjudicial enforcement of order.
(1)  A law enforcement officer of this state, upon determining that there is
probable cause to believe that a valid foreign protection order exists and
that the order has been violated, shall enforce the order as if it were the
order of a tribunal of this state.  Presentation of a protection order that
identifies both the protected individual and the respondent and, on its face,
is currently in effect constitutes probable cause to believe that a valid
foreign protection order exists.  For the purposes of this section, the
protection order may be inscribed on a tangible medium or may have been stored
in an electronic or other medium if it is retrievable in perceivable form.
Presentation of a certified copy of a protection order is not required for
enforcement.
(2)  If a foreign protection order is not presented, a law enforcement officer
of this state may consider other information in determining whether there is
probable cause to believe that a valid foreign protection order exists.
(3)  If a law enforcement officer of this state determines that an otherwise
valid foreign protection order cannot be enforced because the respondent has
not been notified or served with the order, the officer shall inform the
respondent of the order, make a reasonable effort to serve the order upon the
respondent, and allow the respondent a reasonable opportunity to comply with
the order before enforcing the order.
(4)  Registration or filing of an order in this state is not required for the
enforcement of a valid foreign protection order pursuant to this part.
